Utah, session 2026, HB33.
Section 1. Section 20A-11-901 is amended to read:20A-11-901Effective 01/01/27. Political advertisements -- Requirement that ads designate responsibility and authorization -- Report to lieutenant governor -- Unauthorized use of endorsements.(1)(a)Whenever any person makes an expenditure for the purpose of financing an advertisement expressly advocating for the election or defeat of a clearly identified candidate, or solicits any contribution through any broadcasting station, newspaper, magazine, outdoor advertising facility, direct mailing, or any other type of general public political advertising, the advertisement:(i)if paid for and authorized by a candidate or the candidate's campaign committee, shall clearly state that the advertisement has been paid for by the candidate or the campaign committee;(ii)if paid for by another person but authorized by a candidate or the candidate's campaign committee, shall clearly state who paid for the advertisement and that the candidate or the campaign committee authorized the advertisement; or(iii)if not authorized by a candidate or a candidate's campaign committee, shall clearly state the name of the person who paid for the advertisement and state that the advertisement is not authorized by any candidate or candidate's committee.(2)(a)A person that makes an expenditure for the purpose of financing an advertisement related to a ballot proposition shall ensure that the advertisement complies with Subsection (2)(b) if the advertisement expressly advocates:(i)for placing a ballot proposition on the ballot;(ii)for keeping a ballot proposition off the ballot;(iii)that a voter refrain from voting on a ballot proposition; or(iv)that a voter vote for or against a ballot proposition.(b)An advertisement described in Subsection (2)(a) shall:(i)if paid for by a political issues committee, clearly state that the advertisement was paid for by the political issues committee;(ii)if paid for by another person but authorized by a political issues committee, clearly state who paid for the advertisement and that the political issues committee authorized the advertisement; or(iii)if not authorized by a political issues committee, clearly state the name of the person who paid for the advertisement and state that the advertisement is not authorized by any political issues committee.(3)The disclosure statement described in Subsections (1) and (2) shall:(a)clearly and conspicuously identify for the reader, observer, or listener the person who paid for the advertisement and, where required, the authorization related to the advertisement; and(b)if the advertisement is a billboard or outdoor advertising facility, include text that is large enough to be easily readable by an ordinary observer at a reasonable distance from which the advertisement is intended to be viewed.(3)(4)The requirements of Subsections (1) and (2) do not apply to:(a)lawn signs with dimensions of four by eight feet or smalleran advertisement that is a political sign, as that term is defined in Section 20A-17-101.5, that:(i)is less than 24 by 18 inches; or(ii)(A)is paid for and authorized by a candidate or the candidate's campaign committee; and(B)clearly and conspicuously identifies that candidate by name;(b)bumper stickers;(c)campaign pins, buttons, and pens; or(d)similar small items upon which the disclaimerdisclosure statement cannot be conveniently printed.(4)(5)(a)A person who is not a reporting entity and pays for an electioneering communication shall file a report with the lieutenant governor within 24 hours of making the payment or entering into a contract to make the payment.(b)The report shall include:(i)the name and address of the person described in Subsection (4)(a)(5)(a);(ii)the name and address of each person contributing at least $100 to the person described in Subsection (4)(a)(5)(a) for the purpose of disseminating the electioneering communication;(iii)the amount spent on the electioneering communication;(iv)the name of the identified referenced candidate; and(v)the medium used to disseminate the electioneering communication.(5)(6)A person may not, in order to promote the success of any candidate for nomination or election to any public office, or in connection with any question submitted to the voters, include or cause to be included the name of any person as endorser or supporter in any political advertisement, circular, poster, or publication without the express consent of that person.(6)(7)(a)It is unlawful for a person to pay the owner, editor, publisher, or agent of any newspaper or other periodical to induce the owner, editor, publisher, or agent to advocate or oppose editorially any candidate for nomination or election.(b)It is unlawful for any owner, editor, publisher, or agent to accept any payment to advocate or oppose editorially any candidate for nomination or election.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 20A-17-101.5 is enacted to read:20A-17-101.5Effective 05/06/26. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Contact information" means:(a)as it relates to a candidate for public office or the candidate's personal campaign committee:(i)the address and telephone number for the candidate that the candidate designates on a declaration of candidacy as the address and telephone number where the candidate may be contacted to receive official election notices; or(ii)if the address or telephone number described in Subsection (1)(a)(i) is a protected record under Section 63G-2-305, the alternative address or telephone number that the candidate filing the declaration of candidacy provides to the election officer; and(b)as it relates to a filing entity other than a filing entity who is a candidate for public office, the name, address, and telephone number of an officer for the filing entity that the filing entity provides to the lieutenant governor in a statement of organization or financial statement filed under Chapter 11, Campaign and Financial Reporting Requirements.(2)"Filing entity" means the same as that term is defined in Section 20A-11-101.(3)"Local government entity" means:(a)a county, municipality, or other political subdivision;(b)a special district, as defined in Section 17B-1-102;(c)a special service district, as defined in Section 17D-1-102;(d)a local building authority, as defined in Section 17D-2-102;(e)a conservation district, as defined in Section 17D-3-102;(f)an independent entity, as defined in Section 63E-1-102;(g)a public corporation, as defined in Section 63E-1-102;(h)a public transit district, organized under Title 17B, Chapter 2a, Part 8, Public Transit District Act;(i)a school district;(j)a public school, including a charter school or other publicly funded school;(k)a state institution of higher education;(l)an entity that expends public funds; and(m)each office, agency, or other division of an entity described in Subsections (3)(a) through (l).(4)"Park strip" means the area of land located between a roadway and an adjacent sidewalk.(5)"Political sign" means any sign that advocates:(a)the election or defeat of a candidate for public office; or(b)the approval or defeat of a ballot proposition.(6)(a)"Public property" means any real property, building, or structure owned or leased by a local government entity.(b)"Public property" does not include any real property, building, or structure during a period of time that the real property, building, or structure is rented out by a government entity to a private party for a meeting, convention, or similar event.(7)"Railroad sign or signal" means the same as that term is defined in Section 41-6a-102.(8)(a)"Roadway" means:(i)a state highway, as described in Section 72-3-102;(ii)a county road, as described in Section 72-3-103;(iii)a city street, as described in Section 72-3-104;(iv)a class D road, as described in Section 72-3-105; or(v)a rail-based fixed guideway operated by a large public transit district.(b)"Roadway" includes:(i)the right-of-way for a roadway; and(ii)infrastructure appurtenant to a roadway that is owned, maintained, or controlled by:(A)a county or municipality;(B)a large public transit district organized under Title 17B, Chapter 2a, Part 8, Public Transit District Act; or(C)the Department of Transportation created in Title 72, Chapter 1, Part 2, Department of Transportation.(9)"Sign owner" means a person who owns a political sign and, under Subsection 20A-11-901(1) or (2), is required to include a disclosure statement on the political sign.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 20A-17-102 is amended to read:20A-17-102Effective 05/06/26. Political signs -- Prohibition on vandalism -- Exceptions.(1)Except as provided in Subsection (2), a person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if the person knowingly removes, alters, defaces, or otherwise vandalizes a sign:(a)advocating the election or defeat of a candidate for public office; or(b)advocating the approval or defeat of a ballot proposition.(1)Except as provided in Subsection (3) or (5), a person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if the person knowingly:(a)removes, disposes of, alters, defaces, or otherwise vandalizes a political sign; or(b)attaches or affixes any object to a political sign, including another political sign, and the object:(i)hides, blocks, obscures, or otherwise substantially conceals from view the message or image on the political sign; or(ii)changes or misrepresents the intent of the message on the political sign.(2)A person is guilty of an infraction if the person knowingly attaches or affixes a political sign to a utility pole, light pole, an electric utility box, a traffic control device, or any railroad sign or signal.(2)(3)A person is not guilty of a violation of Subsection (1) if the person who engages in the conduct described in Subsection (1) is:(a)as it relates to a sign described in Subsection (1)(a), the candidate or an agent of the candidatethe sign owner;(b)as it relates to a sign described in Subsection (1)(b), the person who placed the political sign, the person who directed the placement of the political sign, or an agent of either;(c)a property owner of property or of a right-of-way adjacent to property on which the political sign is placed, or the property owner's agent; or(d)a public official who removes the sign in accordance with an official duty of the public officialor government employee who removes the political sign in accordance with the duties of the public official or government employee.(4)A sign owner that posts or displays a political sign on a roadway shall ensure that the political sign is removed from the roadway no later than 14 calendar days after the day of the election to which the political sign relates.(5)Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(a), any person may:(a)in response to another person engaging in the conduct described in Subsection (1)(b), remove the object that is attached or affixed to the political sign;(b)in response to another person engaging in the conduct described in Subsection (2), remove the political sign that is attached or affixed to a utility pole, light pole, an electric utility box, a traffic control device, or any railroad sign or signal;(c)remove a political sign that is posted or displayed on a roadway for longer than the time period described in Subsection (4); or(d)remove a political sign because:(i)(A)the size dimensions of the political sign are equal to or greater than the size dimensions described in Subsection 20A-11-901(4)(a); and(B)the political sign does not contain the disclosure statement described in Subsection 20A-11-901(1) or (2); or(ii)the political sign is posted or displayed in a location that violates the prohibition against electioneering described in Subsection 20A-3a-501(2)(a)(i).(6)A person who removes a political sign under Subsection (3)(d) or (5)(d) shall deposit the political sign at a location described in Subsection 20A-17-104(1).(7)Nothing in this section limits the prosecution or sentencing of a person who, while removing a political sign or an object attached or affixed to a political sign under Subsection (3) or (5), commits an offense under Title 76, Utah Criminal Code.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 20A-17-103 is amended to read:20A-17-103Effective 05/06/26. Posting political signs on public property.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Local government entity" means:(i)a county, municipality, or other political subdivision;(ii)a special district, as defined in Section 17B-1-102;(iii)a special service district, as defined in Section 17D-1-102;(iv)a local building authority, as defined in Section 17D-2-102;(v)a conservation district, as defined in Section 17D-3-102;(vi)an independent entity, as defined in Section 63E-1-102;(vii)a public corporation, as defined in Section 63E-1-102;(viii)a public transit district, organized under Title 17B, Chapter 2a, Part 8, Public Transit District Act;(ix)a school district;(x)a public school, including a charter school or other publicly funded school;(xi)a state institution of higher education;(xii)an entity that expends public funds; and(xiii)each office, agency, or other division of an entity described in Subsections (1)(a)(i) through (xii).(b)"Political sign" means any sign or document that advocates:(i)the election or defeat of a candidate for public office; or(ii)the approval or defeat of a ballot proposition.(c)(i)"Public property" means any real property, building, or structure owned or leased by a local government entity.(ii)"Public property" does not include any real property, building, or structure during a period of time that the real property, building, or structure is rented out by a government entity to a private party for a meeting, convention, or similar event.(2)(1)A local government entity, a local government officer, a local government employee, or another person with authority or control over public property that posts or permits a person to post a political sign on public property:(a)shall permit any other person to post a political sign on the public property, subject to the same requirements and restrictions imposed on all other political signs permitted to be posted on the public property; and(b)may not impose a requirement or restriction on the posting of a political sign if the requirement or restriction is not politically neutral and content neutral.(2)A local government entity may not prohibit a person from posting a political sign on a park strip if the person:(a)(i)is the owner or lawful occupant of property that is adjacent to the park strip; and(ii)is required by a local ordinance or an agreement to maintain the park strip; or(b)obtains consent to post the political sign from the person described in Subsection (2)(a).(3)Nothing in this section prohibits a local government entity from regulating the posting of a political sign under this section to prevent a traffic, pedestrian, or line-of-sight hazard.

Section 5:
Section 5. Section 20A-17-104 is enacted to read:20A-17-104Effective 05/06/26. Safeguarding and disposing of political signs -- County and municipal locations -- Reimbursement from sign owner.(1)Each county and each municipality shall designate one or more locations within the county or municipality where an individual who removes a political sign under Subsection 20A-17-102(3)(d) or (5)(d) may deposit the political sign for safekeeping or disposal in accordance with this section.(2)Subject to Subsection (3), and except as provided in Subsection (4), a county or municipality that receives a political sign at a location described in Subsection (1) shall:(a)safeguard the political sign;(b)use reasonable efforts to obtain contact information for the sign owner:(i)from the election officer for the election to which the political sign relates, if the sign owner is a candidate for public office or the candidate's personal campaign committee;(ii)from the lieutenant governor, if the sign owner is a filing entity other than a filing entity who is a candidate for public office or the candidate's personal campaign committee; or(iii)using any other lawful means available to the county or municipality;(c)make a reasonable attempt to contact the sign owner by telephone; and(d)notify the sign owner, either during a direct conversation or in a voicemail, that the sign owner has five business days after the date of the notice to take possession of the political sign.(3)If a sign owner receives the notice described in Subsection (2)(d) but does not take possession of the political sign by the deadline described in Subsection (2)(d), or, if a county or municipality is unable to contact a sign owner under Subsection (2)(c), the county or municipality may:(a)dispose of the political sign; and(b)seek reimbursement from the sign owner in accordance with Subsection (5) for the cost of safekeeping or disposing of the political sign, if, during the same election cycle:(i)the county or municipality has, on three or more previous occasions, received a political sign belonging to the same sign owner at a location described in Subsection (1); and(ii)on each occasion:(A)the sign owner did not take possession of the political sign after receiving the notice described in Subsection (2)(d); or(B)the county or municipality was unable to contact the sign owner under Subsection (2)(c).(4)A county or municipality that receives a political sign at a location described in Subsection (1) may dispose of the political sign if the county or municipality:(a)cannot identify the sign owner; or(b)cannot obtain contact information for the sign owner under Subsection (2)(b).(5)(a)A county or municipality that seeks reimbursement under Subsection (3)(b) shall mail a reimbursement notice to the sign owner using the contact information that the county or municipality obtains under Subsection (2)(b).(b)A reimbursement notice shall include:(i)the number of political signs safeguarded or disposed of by the county or municipality;(ii)subject to Subsection (5)(c), the reimbursement amount; and(iii)any other information deemed relevant by the county or municipality to obtain reimbursement for safeguarding or disposing of the political sign.(c)The reimbursement amount that a county or municipality may seek for a political sign deposited at a location described in Subsection (1) may not exceed $20 per deposit incident, regardless of the number of political signs belonging to the same sign owner that are included in that deposit.(6)(a)Subject to Subsection (6)(b), a sign owner that receives a reimbursement notice under Subsection (5) shall pay the amount specified in the notice no later than 30 calendar days after the day on which the reimbursement notice is received in the mail.(b)A county or municipality shall provide the sign owner a reasonable opportunity to establish, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the payment of reimbursement is not required.(7)A sign owner that receives a reimbursement notice under this section may use campaign funds to pay the reimbursement amount specified in the notice.

Section 6:
Section 6.  Effective Date.(1)Except as provided in Subsection (2), this bill takes effect May 6, 2026.(2)The actions affecting Section 20A-11-901 Effective 01/01/27 take effect on January 1, 2027.